South Dakota, session 2026, HB1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 50-15-3 be AMENDED:
50-15-3. No person may operate a drone over the grounds of a prison, correctional
facility, jail, juvenile detention facility, or any military facility unless expressly authorized
by the administrator thereof. A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.
Law enforcement officers may utilize mitigation techniques and countermeasures,
authorized in accordance with section 2 of this Act, in response to a violation of this
section.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 50-15:
The Department of Public Safety may promulgate rules, in accordance with chapter
1-26, to:
(1) Identify the nature and scope of mitigation techniques and drone countermeasures
that may be utilized in response to a violation of § 50-15-3; and
(2) Develop and implement a training program for law enforcement officers in the
selection and use of mitigation techniques and drone countermeasures.

26.956.13 2 1280
An Act to increase penalties for the operation of drones over certain facilities and to provide
for mitigation techniques and countermeasures.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1280
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1280 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1280 ENROLLED